Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-519
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 19.